Hawaii statutes.
§238-10 Penalties. Penalties and
interest shall be added to and become a part of the tax, when and as provided
by section 231-39. [L 1965, c 155, pt of §2; Supp, §119-10; HRS §238-10]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next